Hawaii statutes.
§378-37 Enforcement of order; judgment
rendered thereon. If an employer fails or neglects to comply with the
final order of the department of labor and industrial relations from which no
appeal has been taken as provided by this part, the department or the employee
affected may apply to the circuit court of the judicial circuit in which the
employer resides or transacts business for a judgment to enforce the provisions
of the final order and for any other appropriate relief. In any proceeding to
enforce the provisions of the final order, the department or the employee
affected need only file with the court proof that notice of the hearing was
given, a certified copy of the final order, and proof that the final order was
served. The judgment shall have the same effect, and all proceedings in
relation thereto shall thereafter be the same, as though the judgment had been
rendered in an action duly heard and determined by the court. [L 1967, c 22, pt
of §1; HRS §378-37; am L 1986, c 21, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next